Illinois, session 104th, HB4889.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The amount of $600,000, or so much of that 5amount as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General 6Revenue Fund to the Department of Human Services to supply 7free fentanyl testing strips to public institutions of higher 8education. 9    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 102026.